Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-190
Board of Parole; members; terms; removal; procedure.

(1) The members of the Board of Parole shall have terms of office of six years and until their successors are appointed. The successors shall be appointed in the same manner as provided for the members first appointed, and a vacancy occurring before expiration of a term of office shall be similarly filled for the unexpired term. A member of the board may be reappointed. The members of the board shall be removed for disability, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office by the Board of Pardons after a hearing. The Board of Pardons shall promptly file in the office of the Secretary of State a complete statement of the charges, its findings and disposition, and a complete record of the proceedings.

(2) For purposes of this section, neglect of duty includes not attending a total of twelve full days of hearings of the Board of Parole within a calendar year. A member's failure to attend a hearing day shall not count toward such limit if the failure was due to a medical appointment that could not reasonably be rescheduled or delayed, a family emergency, illness, an act of God, or similar circumstances beyond the member's control.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 21, p. 3084;

Laws 1973, LB 524, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 603, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 677, § 4;

Laws 2024, LB631, § 28.
July 19, 2024